Utah statutes.
35A-3-110.   Third party obligation -- Interest.

Whenever the division expends public assistance on behalf of a client for services or supplies, for which another person is obligated to reimburse the division, that other person shall make such reimbursement within 60 days of notification by the division.  If reimbursement is not made within that period, and no extension of time is granted by the division, interest shall accrue on the unpaid balance at the rate of 8% per annum.

